Maryland, session 2025, HB0842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
1–201.
(b) Subject to definitions contained in other articles of the Maryland Uniform
Commercial Code that apply to particular titles or parts of titles of the Maryland Uniform
Commercial Code:
(27) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other
legal or commercial entity.
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 50 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 50. FARM EQUIPMENT REPAIR.
14–5001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS
UNAFFILIATED WITH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER AND THAT HAS:
(I) AN ARRANGEMENT WITH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER UNDER WHICH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER
GRANTS TO THE PERSON A LICENSE TO USE A TRADE NAME, SERVICE MARK, OR
OTHER PROPRIETARY IDENTIFIER FOR THE PURPOSES OF OFFERING THE SERVICES
OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF FARM EQUIPMENT UNDER THE NAME
OF THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER; OR

HOUSE BILL 842 3
(II) ANOTHER ARRANGEMENT WITH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER TO OFFER THE SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR
REPAIR ON BEHALF OF THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER.
(2) “AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER” INCLUDES AN ORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER THAT:
(I) OFFERS THE SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR
REPAIR OF FARM EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURED BY THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER OR ON ITS BEHALF, OR SOLD OR OTHERWISE SUPPLIED BY THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER; AND
(II) DOES NOT HAVE AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITH AN UNAFFILIATED PERSON.
(C) “DOCUMENTATION” MEANS ANY MANUAL, DIAGRAM, REPORTING
OUTPUT, SERVICE CODE DESCRIPTION, SCHEMATIC, OR OTHER INFORMATION USED
IN EFFECTING THE SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF FARM
EQUIPMENT.
(D) (1) “FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS” MEANS COSTS AND TERMS THAT
ARE EQUIVALENT TO THE MOST FAVORABLE COSTS AND TERMS UNDER WHICH THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER OFFERS THE PART, TOOL, OR
DOCUMENTATION TO AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER:
(I) ACCOUNTING FOR:
1. ANY DISCOUNT, REBATE, OR CONVENIENT AND
TIMELY MEANS OF DELIVERY;
2. MEANS OF ENABLING FULLY RESTORED AND
UPDATED FUNCTIONALITY, RIGHTS OF USE, OR OTHER INCENTIVE OR PREFERENCE
THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER OFFERS TO AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR
PROVIDER; OR
3. ANY ADDITIONAL COST, BURDEN, OR IMPEDIMENT
THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER IMPOSES ON AN OWNER OR
INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER; AND
(II) NOT CONDITIONED ON HAVING AN ARRANGEMENT
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER.

HOUSE BILL 842
(2) “FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS” INCLUDES ANY RELEVANT
UPDATES TO DOCUMENTATION AT NO CHARGE OR, IF THE DOCUMENTATION IS
REQUESTED IN PHYSICAL PRINTED FORM, A CHARGE THAT IS LIMITED TO THE
REASONABLE ACTUAL COSTS OF PREPARING AND SENDING THE COPY.
(E) (1) “FARM EQUIPMENT” MEANS EQUIPMENT THAT IS USED OR
INTENDED FOR USE IN A FARM OPERATION.
(2) “FARM EQUIPMENT” INCLUDES ANY COMBINE, TRACTOR,
IMPLEMENT, ENGINE, MOTOR, OR ATTACHMENT.
(3) “FARM EQUIPMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A VEHICLE AS DEFINED
IN § 11–176 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(F) “FARM EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER” MEANS A BUSINESS ENGAGED IN
SELLING, LEASING, OR OTHERWISE SUPPLYING NEW FARM EQUIPMENT, OR PARTS
OF FARM EQUIPMENT, MANUFACTURED BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE MANUFACTURER,
TO ANOTHER PERSON.
(G) (1) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON
OPERATING IN THE STATE THAT:
(I) DOES NOT HAVE AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER; AND
(II) IS NOT AFFILIATED WITH A PERSON THAT HAS AN
ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER WHEN THE PERSON IS ENGAGED IN THE
SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF FARM EQUIPMENT.
(2) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER” INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING
WHEN ENGAGED IN THE SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF
FARM EQUIPMENT THAT IS NOT MANUFACTURED BY OR ON BEHALF OF, OR SOLD OR
OTHERWISE SUPPLIED BY, THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER:
(I) AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER; AND
(II) A PERSON THAT:
1. HAS AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER; OR

HOUSE BILL 842 5
2. IS AFFILIATED WITH A PERSON THAT HAS AN
ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER.
(H) “PART” MEANS ANY REPLACEMENT PART, EITHER NEW OR USED, MADE
AVAILABLE BY OR TO AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER FOR PURPOSES OF
EFFECTING THE SERVICES OF MAINTENANCE OR REPAIR OF FARM EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURED BY OR ON BEHALF OF, SOLD BY, OR OTHERWISE SUPPLIED BY THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER.
(I) (1) “TOOL” MEANS ANY SOFTWARE PROGRAM, HARDWARE, OR OTHER
APPARATUS USED FOR DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF FARM
EQUIPMENT.
(2) “TOOL” INCLUDES SOFTWARE OR OTHER MECHANISMS THAT
PROVISION, PROGRAM, OR PAIR A PART, CALIBRATE FUNCTIONALITY, OR PERFORM
ANY OTHER FUNCTION REQUIRED TO BRING THE PRODUCT BACK TO FULLY
FUNCTIONAL CONDITION.
(J) “TRADE SECRET” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–1201 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
14–5002.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO FARM EQUIPMENT THAT IS SOLD OR
USED IN THE STATE.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE AN EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER OR AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER TO:
(1) DIVULGE A TRADE SECRET TO AN OWNER OR TO AN INDEPENDENT
REPAIR PROVIDER EXCEPT AS NECESSARY TO PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION, PARTS,
AND TOOLS ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS; OR
(2) PROVIDE ACCESS TO DOCUMENTATION THAT DOES NOT SERVE A
SECURITY RESET, DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, OR REPAIR PURPOSE.
(C) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, ALTER THE
TERMS OF AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN § 14–5001(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE IN
FORCE BETWEEN AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER AND AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT

HOUSE BILL 842
MANUFACTURER, INCLUDING THE PERFORMANCE OR PROVISION OF WARRANTY OR
RECALL REPAIR WORK BY AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER ON BEHALF OF AN
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER UNDER THE ARRANGEMENT; OR
(2) REQUIRE AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER TO MAKE
AVAILABLE A PART THAT IS NO LONGER AVAILABLE TO THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER.
(D) A TERM IN AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN § 14–5001(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE BETWEEN AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER AND AN ORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER THAT PURPORTS TO WAIVE, AVOID, RESTRICT, OR
LIMIT THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER’S OBLIGATIONS TO COMPLY
WITH THIS SUBTITLE IS VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE.
14–5003.
(A) FOR FARM EQUIPMENT, OR PARTS FOR FARM EQUIPMENT,
MANUFACTURED BY AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER OR ON ITS BEHALF,
OR SOLD OR OTHERWISE SUPPLIED BY IT, AND SOLD USED IN THE STATE, THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER SHALL, ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS,
MAKE AVAILABLE TO AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER OR OWNER OF THE FARM
EQUIPMENT DOCUMENTATION, PARTS, AND TOOLS, INCLUSIVE OF ANY UPDATES,
FOR PURPOSES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF THE FARM
EQUIPMENT.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A FARM
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER THAT SELLS FARM EQUIPMENT THAT CONTAINS A
SECURITY–RELATED FUNCTION SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO AN OWNER OR
INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER, ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS, ANY SPECIAL
DOCUMENTATION, TOOLS, AND PARTS NEEDED TO RESET THE LOCK OR FUNCTION.
(2) IF NECESSARY FOR SECURITY PURPOSES, A FARM EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER MAY PROVIDE INFORMATION NECESSARY TO RESET AN
IMMOBILIZER SYSTEM OR SECURITY–RELATED ELECTRONIC MODULE THROUGH A
SECURE DATA RELEASE SYSTEM.
(C) ANY PROVISION IN AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR AGREEMENT PURPORTING
TO WAIVE, AVOID, OR LIMIT A FARM EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER’S COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE VOID.
14–5004.
A FARM EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER MAY NOT KNOWINGLY MISREPRESENT

HOUSE BILL 842 7
OR WITHHOLD FARM EQUIPMENT PART NUMBERS FROM A CUSTOMER FOR THE
PURPOSE OF PREVENTING THE CUSTOMER FROM SHOPPING FOR A COMPETITIVE
PRICE ON A REPLACEMENT PART.
14–5005.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to abrogate, interfere with,
contradict, or alter the terms of any contract that is executed between an authorized repair
provider and a farm equipment manufacturer before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.